ro-RO: Sistem de montare a legăturilor: Reglabil pe șină/Demo; Montare plată; Placă IFP; Placă integrată; Placă NIS; Șină; Altele
ko: 바인딩 장착 시스템: 데모/트랙 조절 가능; 플랫 마운트; IFP 플레이트; 통합형 플레이트; NIS 플레이트; 레일/트랙; 기타
hr-HR: Sustav montaže vezova: Prilagodljivi (demo/track); Ravna montaža; IFP ploča; Integrirana ploča; NIS ploča; Vodilica (šina); Ostalo
hu: Kötésrögzítési rendszer: Demo/sínes (állítható); Sík rögzítés; IFP platni; Integrált platni; NIS platni; Sín/pálya; Egyéb
bg-BG: Система за монтаж на ски автомата: С регулируема релса (Demo); Плосък монтаж; IFP пластина; Интегрирана пластина; NIS пластина; На релса; Други
sl-SI: Sistem za pritrditev vezi: Demo/nastavljivo prek vodil; Ravna pritrditev; Plošča IFP; Integrirana plošča; Plošča NIS; Vodila; Drugo
vi: Hệ thống gắn liên kết: Khay trượt/ray trượt có thể điều chỉnh; Ngàm phẳng; Đĩa IFP; Đĩa tích hợp; Đĩa NIS; Ray/khay trượt; Khác
tr: Bağlama montaj sistemi: Demo/ray ayarlı; Düz montaj; IFP plakası; Entegre plaka; NIS plakası; Kızak/ray; Diğer
nl: Binding montagesysteem: Verstelbare demo/rail; Platte montage; IFP-plaat; Geïntegreerde plaat; NIS-plaat; Rail; Anders
ja: ビンディングマウントシステム: デモ / トラック調整可能; フラットマウント; IFPプレート; インテグレーテッドプレート; NISプレート; レール / トラック; その他
fi: Siteiden kiinnitysjärjestelmä: Säädettävä demo/kisko; Tasokiinnitys; IFP-levy; Integroitu levy; NIS-levy; Kisko/rata; Muu
el: Σύστημα στήριξης με συνδέσεις: Demo / ρυθμιζόμενη ράγα; Επίπεδη βάση (Flat mount); Πλάκα IFP; Ενσωματωμένη πλάκα; Πλάκα NIS; Ράγα/κανάλι; Άλλο
da: Bindingsmonteringssystem: Justerbar demo/skinne; Flad montering; IFP-plade; Integreret plade; NIS-plade; Skinne/spor; Andet
zh-CN: 固定器安装系统: 演示/轨道可调; 平装; IFP 垫板; 集成垫板; NIS 垫板; 导轨/轨道; 其他
sv: Bindningens monteringssystem: Justerbar med spår/demo; Platt fäste; IFP-platta; Integrerad platta; NIS-platta; Skena/spår; Övrigt
it: sistema di montaggio per rilegatura: Regolabile demo/track; Montaggio flat; Piastra IFP; Piastra integrata; Piastra NIS; A binario/track; Altro
sk-SK: Systém upevnenia viazania: Demo/nastaviteľné na lište; Plochá montáž; Doska IFP; Integrovaná doska; Doska NIS; Lišta/koľajnička; Iné
es: Sistema de montaje de la fijación: Demo/riel ajustable; Montaje plano; Placa IFP; Placa integrada; Placa NIS; Riel/guía; Otro
ru: Система крепления: Тестовые / регулируемые по направляющей; Плоское крепление; Платформа IFP; Интегрированная платформа; Платформа NIS; Рельс/направляющая; Другое
en: Binding mounting system: Demo/track adjustable; Flat mount; IFP plate; Integrated plate; NIS plate; Rail/track; Other
nb: Bindende monteringssystem: Justerbar for demo/spor; Flatmontering; IFP-plate; Integrert plate; NIS-plate; Skinne/spor; Annet
de: Bindungsmontagesystem: Demo/Schiene verstellbar; Flachmontage; IFP-Platte; Integrierte Platte; NIS-Platte; Schiene/Track; Sonstige
pt-PT: Sistema de montagem de fixação: Ajustável demo/carris; Montagem plana; Placa IFP; Placa integrada; Placa NIS; Carril/via; Outros
zh-TW: 固定器安裝系統: 滑軌可調式; 平面安裝; IFP 底板; 整合式底板; NIS 底板; 滑軌; 其他
pt-BR: Sistema de montagem da fixação: Ajustável demo/trilho; Montagem plana; Placa IFP; Placa integrada; Placa NIS; Trilho/faixa; Outro
pl: System montażu wiązań: Testowy / szyna z regulacją; Mocowanie płaskie; Płyta IFP; Zintegrowana płyta; Płyta NIS; Szyna/tor; Inny
th: ระบบการติดตั้งตัวล็อกรองเท้าสกี: ปรับแบบสาธิต/แทร็ก; ยึดแบบแบน; แผ่น IFP; แผ่นในตัว; แผ่น NIS; ราง/แทร็ก; อื่นๆ
cs: Montážní systém vázání: Nastavitelné (Demo/Track); Plochá montáž; IFP deska; Integrovaná deska; NIS deska; Kolejnice; Jiné
lt-LT: Tvirtinimo sistema: „Demo“ / reguliuojamas bėgelis; Plokščias tvirtinimas; IFP plokštelė; Integruota plokštelė; NIS plokštelė; Bėgelis; Kita
fr: Système de montage des fixations: Demo/rail ajustable; Montage à plat; Plaque IFP; Plaque intégrée; Plaque NIS; Rail; Autre